Arkansas, session 2025, HB1708.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Keep the Bonus, Axe
the Tax: The No-Tax Bonus Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-317. Bonuses.
(a) As used in this section, "bonus" means a payment made to an
employee that:
(1) Is in addition to the employee’s regular or overtime wages;
(2) Is nonrecurring;
(3) Does not increase the employee’s base rate of pay; and
(4) Includes no commitment for payment in a subsequent year.
(b) A bonus is exempt from the income tax levied under this chapter.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
*JLL275*
03/06/2025 4:19:38 PM JLL275